Montana, session 2025, HB152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Form of ballot on retention of county attorney. (1) If the incumbent is
the only candidate for the office of county attorney, the election administrator may not include a nonpartisan
designation, if applicable, or write-in space for the office on the general election ballot. The name of the
incumbent must be placed on the official ballot for the general election as follows:
Shall (insert name of the incumbent officer), the county attorney of (county name), be retained in office
for another term?
(2) Following the question, provision must be made, subject to rules adopted pursuant to 13-12-
202, for a voter to indicate a "yes" or "no" vote.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 7, chapter 4, part 27, and the provisions of Title 7, chapter 4, part 27, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 152